Utah statutes.
61-2f-507.   Division authority to act upon receipt of petition.

(1)  When the division is served a petition under Section 61-2f-506, the division may:

(a)  file an answer to the petition in the court;

(b)  initiate a review proceeding conducted by the division; or

(c)  appear in any proceeding in the name of the defendant to the action or on behalf of the fund.

(2)  The division may settle a claim against the fund if:

(a)  the person who brings the claim requests a settlement; and

(b)  the court in which the petition is filed approves the settlement.

